Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 7. Complaints

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-701.
Complaint; investigations; conference; cease and desist order; hearing; referee.

If the director or the administrators have cause to believe that any persons are violating any provision of this act or any rule, regulation, standard, permit, license, or variance issued pursuant hereto, or in case any written complaint is filed with the department alleging a violation, the director, through the appropriate administrator, shall cause a prompt investigation to be made.

For surface coal mining operations, in the instance of a written complaint by any person which provides a reasonable basis to believe that a violation of article 4 of this act, or of any rule, regulation, standard, order, license, variance or permit issued thereunder, exists, the investigation shall include a prompt inspection. In such event the director shall notify the person when the inspection is proposed to be carried out and the person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection, subject to reasonable control by the inspector. The operator shall have a duty to exercise reasonable care for the person’s safety only if his presence is known. However, this duty shall not include the duty to inspect the premises to discover dangers which are unknown to the operator, nor giving warning or protection against conditions which are known or should be obvious to the person. The operator or his designee shall be allowed to be present for any such inspection.

For other than those violations specified under subsection (b) of this section, if, as a result of the investigation, it appears that a violation exists, the administrator of the proper division may, by conference, conciliation and persuasion, endeavor promptly to eliminate the source or cause of the violation:

In case of failure to correct or remedy an alleged violation, the director shall cause to be issued and served upon the person alleged to be responsible for any such violation a written notice which shall specify the provision of this act, rule, regulation, standard, permit, license, or variance alleged to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof, and may require the person so complained against to cease and desist from the violation within the time the director may determine;

Any order is final unless, not later than ten (10) days after the date the notice is served, the person or persons named therein request, in writing, a hearing before the council. Upon the filing of a request the order complained of shall be stayed pending the council’s final determination thereon;

If after a hearing held pursuant to this section, the council finds that a violation has occurred, it shall affirm or modify such order previously issued, or issue an appropriate order or orders for the prevention, abatement or control of the violation involved or for the taking of other corrective action. If, after a hearing on an order contained in a notice, the council finds that no violation has occurred, it shall rescind the order. Any order issued as part of a notice or after hearing may prescribe the date or dates by which the violation shall cease and may prescribe timetables for action. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed as preventing any person from applying for a variance as provided in W.S.

35-11-601

;

At any hearing before the council, it may designate a person to be a referee and may authorize the referee to receive evidence, administer oaths, examine witnesses and issue subpoenas requiring the testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence and to make reports and recommendations with respect thereto. Any final determination based on the evidence received by any referee shall be made solely by the council.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to in any way limit or contravene any other remedy available under this act, nor shall this section be interpreted as a condition precedent to any other enforcement action under this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.46; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1995, ch. 28, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

“Order” referred to in subsection (c)(ii) and (iii) is cease and desist order

and not simply a written notice of violation. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

No review of written notice of violation under section. —

There is no provision in this section for a review by the environmental quality council of the allegations contained in a written notice of violation issued pursuant to subsection (c)(i), because §

35-11-901

provides the alleged violator with a review of the allegation prior to the assessment of any penalty. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Administrative remedies of section not prerequisite to action under §

35-11-901

. —

The state is not required to exhaust any of the administrative remedies set forth in this section before commencing a civil action under §

35-11-901

to collect penalties for violating this chapter. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Doctrines of exhaustion of administrative remedies and primary jurisdiction inapplicable. —

Neither the doctrine of exhaustion of administrative remedies nor the doctrine of primary jurisdiction are applicable in an action seeking penalties from an energy corporation for violation of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act. People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982).

Emissions Outside Routine Operations. —

In determining a proposed facility's potential to emit sulfur dioxide, emissions from cold starts and malfunctions did not have to be considered because they were not routine operations; moreover, they would be regulated as excess emissions if they exceeded the limit in the air quality permit.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Town of Torrington v. Envtl. Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Roberts Constr. Co. v. Vondriska, 547 P.2d 1171,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1976); Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Citizen's action under 33 USC § 1365(a)(1) for violation of effluent standards or limitations under Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1251 et seq.) or orders with respect thereto, 68 ALR Fed 701.

Relief available in citizen's suit under 42 USC § 6972 for violation of federal requirements relating to solid or hazardous waste, 71 ALR Fed 181.